Utah statutes.
57-18-3.   Acquisition of conservation easement.

A charitable organization which qualifies as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or a governmental entity may acquire a conservation easement by purchase, gift, devise, grant, lease, or bequest.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 1985 General Session

